Maryland, session 2026, SB0655.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–1701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Anaerobic digestion” means the controlled anaerobic biological decomposition
of organic waste material to produce biogas and digestate.
(b–1) (1) “Architectural paint” means interior and exterior architectural coatings
sold in containers of 5 gallons or less.
(2) “Architectural paint” does not include industrial coatings, original
equipment coatings, or specialty coatings.
(c) “Compost” means the product of composting in accordance with the standards
established by the Secretary of Agriculture under § 6–221 of the Agriculture Article.
(d) “Composting” means the controlled aerobic biological decomposition of organic
waste material in accordance with the standards established by the Secretary under this
title.
(e) (1) “Composting facility” means a facility where composting takes place.
(2) “Composting facility” does not include a facility that is required to
obtain:

SENATE BILL 655 3
(i) A natural wood waste recycling facility permit in accordance with
this title;
(ii) A sewage sludge utilization permit in accordance with this title;
or
(iii) A refuse disposal permit in accordance with this title.
(f) (1) “Computer” means a desktop personal computer [or], laptop computer,
OR NOTEBOOK COMPUTER, including, IF APPLICABLE, the computer monitor.
(2) “Computer” does not include:
(i) A personal digital assistant device; or
(ii) A computer peripheral device, including:
1. A mouse or other similar pointing device;
2. A printer; or
3. A detachable keyboard.
(g) (1) “Covered electronic device” means [a]:
(I) A computer [or video];
(II) A COMPUTER MONITOR;
(III) A TELEVISION;
(IV) A VIDEO display device [with a screen that is greater than 4
inches measured diagonally];
(V) A DESKTOP COMPUTER;
(VI) A PORTABLE COMPUTER;
(VII) A NOTEBOOK COMPUTER;
(VIII) A LAPTOP COMPUTER;
(IX) AN E–READING DEVICE;
(X) A TABLET COMPUTER;

SENATE BILL 655
(XI) A ROUTER;
(XII) A MODEM;
(XIII) A COMPUTER CENTRAL PROCESSING UNIT;
(XIV) A PRINTER;
(XV) A SCANNER;
(XVI) A FACSIMILE MACHINE;
(XVII) A COPIER;
(XVIII) A GPS SYSTEM;
(XIX) A CAMERA;
(XX) A RADIO;
(XXI) REMOTE HEADPHONES;
(XXII) EARPHONES;
(XXIII) EARBUDS;
(XXIV) A POWER STRIP;
(XXV) A SMALL–SCALE SERVER;
(XXVI) A DIGITAL VIDEO DISC PLAYER OR RECORDER;
(XXVII) A VIDEOCASSETTE RECORDER;
(XXVIII) A DIGITAL CONVERTER BOX;
(XXIX) A CABLE RECEIVER;
(XXX) A SATELLITE RECEIVER;
(XXXI) AN ELECTRONIC MUSIC PLAYER;

SENATE BILL 655 5
(XXXII) A VIDEO GAME CONSOLE OR CONTROLLER;
(XXXIII) A HOME AUDIO COMPONENT OR SPEAKER;
(XXXIV) A COMPUTER PERIPHERAL DEVICE;
(XXXV) A PERSONAL DIGITAL ASSISTANT; OR
(XXXVI) ANY OTHER COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE IF
ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN REGULATION.
(2) “Covered electronic device” does not include a video display OR OTHER
ELECTRONIC device that is [part]:
(I) PART OR A COMPONENT PART of a motor vehicle [or that is
contained];
(II) CONTAINED within a household appliance [or], INCLUDING
WHITE GOODS SUCH AS FREEZERS, MICROWAVE OVENS, DISHWASHERS,
DEHUMIDIFIERS, AIR PURIFIERS, WATER PUMPS, SUMP PUMPS, OR EXERCISE
EQUIPMENT;
(III) PART OF, CONNECTED TO, OR INTEGRATED WITHIN A
LARGER PIECE OF EQUIPMENT OR SYSTEM DESIGNED AND INTENDED FOR USE IN,
OR THAT IS TAKEN OUT OF SERVICE FROM, A commercial, RETAIL, RESEARCH AND
DEVELOPMENT, LIBRARY CHECKOUT, TRAFFIC CONTROL, KIOSK, PROFESSIONAL
SECURITY, GOVERNMENTAL, AGRICULTURAL, industrial, or medical [equipment]
SETTING;
(IV) EQUIPMENT USED FOR SECURITY, SENSING, MONITORING,
ANTITERRORISM, OR EMERGENCY SERVICES;
(V) A TELEPHONE OF ANY TYPE;
(VI) A MEDICAL PRODUCT AS DEFINED IN THE FEDERAL FOOD,
DRUG, AND COSMETIC ACT; OR
(VII) A STATIONARY ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM.
[(h) “Covered electronic device takeback program” means a program, established
by a covered electronic device manufacturer or a group of covered electronic device
manufacturers, for the collection and recycling, refurbishing, or reuse of a covered
electronic device labeled with the name of the manufacturer or the manufacturer’s brand
label, including:

SENATE BILL 655
(1) Providing, at no cost to the returner, a method of returning a covered
electronic device to the manufacturer, including postage paid mailing packages or
designated collection points throughout the State;
(2) Contracting with a recycler, local government, other manufacturer, or
any other person; or
(3) Any other program approved by the Department.]
(H) “COVERED ENTITY” MEANS:
(1) A HOUSEHOLD IN THE STATE;
(2) A BUSINESS OR NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT EMPLOYS 10 OR
FEWER INDIVIDUALS;
(3) A PUBLIC SECTOR AGENCY OR ENTITY; OR
(4) ANY PERSON THAT GIVES SEVEN OR FEWER COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICES TO AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE COLLECTOR AT ANY ONE TIME.
(i) “Director” means the Director of the Office of Recycling.
[(i–1)] (J) “Distributor” means a company that has a contractual relationship with
one or more producers to market and sell architectural paint to retailers in the State.
(K) “ELECTRONIC DEVICE COLLECTOR” MEANS AN ENTITY THAT COLLECTS
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES AS PART OF AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM.
(L) “ELECTRONIC DEVICE COORDINATING BODY” MEANS AN ENTITY
DESIGNATED BY MULTIPLE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATIONS OR THE DEPARTMENT TO COORDINATE ACTIVITIES BETWEEN THE
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS.
(M) (1) “ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER” MEANS ANY PERSON:
(I) THAT MANUFACTURES COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES
UNDER A BRAND THAT IT OWNS OR THAT IT IS LICENSED TO USE;
(II) THAT SELLS COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES
MANUFACTURED BY OTHERS UNDER A BRAND THAT THE SELLER OWNS;

SENATE BILL 655 7
(III) THAT MANUFACTURES COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES
WITHOUT AFFIXING A BRAND;
(IV) THAT MANUFACTURES COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES TO
WHICH IT AFFIXES A BRAND THAT IT DOES NOT OWN; OR
(V) ON WHOSE ACCOUNT COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES
MANUFACTURED OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES ARE IMPORTED INTO THE UNITED
STATES UNLESS ANOTHER PERSON IS REGISTERED AS THE MANUFACTURER OF THE
BRAND OF THE COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES.
(2) “ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
PERSON:
(I) WITH A LICENSE TO MANUFACTURE COVERED ELECTRONIC
DEVICES FOR DELIVERY EXCLUSIVELY TO OR AT THE ORDER OF THE LICENSER; OR
(II) THAT MANUFACTURES ONLY PERIPHERALS AND NO OTHER
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES.
(N) “ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER OBLIGATION” MEANS AN
ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER’S PERCENTAGE OF THE TOTAL OBLIGATION
OF ALL ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURERS OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES.
(O) “ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER’S MARKET SHARE” MEANS AN
ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER’S PERCENTAGE OF ALL REGISTERED
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES BY WEIGHT SOLD WITHIN AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCT CATEGORY DURING A SPECIFIED TIME PERIOD.
(P) “ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION”
MEANS AN ORGANIZATION THAT REPRESENTS AT LEAST 5% OF ALL ELECTRONIC
DEVICE MANUFACTURER OBLIGATIONS, DESIGNATED BY AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE
MANUFACTURER OR GROUP OF ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURERS TO ACT AS
AN AGENT OF THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER OR GROUP OF
ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURERS IN ORDER TO DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT AN
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM ON BEHALF OF THE
ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER OR GROUP OF ELECTRONIC DEVICE
MANUFACTURERS.
(Q) “ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM” MEANS
A STATEWIDE PROGRAM FOR COLLECTING, TRANSPORTING, AND RECYCLING
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES THAT IS IMPLEMENTED BY AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE

SENATE BILL 655
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH A PLAN
APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(R) “ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCT CATEGORY” MEANS A GROUPING OF
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT, FOR
PURPOSES OF SORTING COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES AT COLLECTION AND
CALCULATING MARKET SHARE.
(S) “ELECTRONIC DEVICE RETAILER” MEANS ANY PERSON THAT OFFERS
FOR SALE A COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE BY ANY MEANS, INCLUDING
TRANSACTIONS CONDUCTED THROUGH SALES OUTLETS, CATALOGS, OR THE
INTERNET.
(T) “ENVIRONMENTALLY SOUND MANAGEMENT PRACTICES” MEANS
PRACTICES THAT COMPLY WITH ALL APPLICABLE LAWS, INCLUDING LAWS RELATED
TO:
(1) ADEQUATE RECORD KEEPING;
(2) TRACKING THE END USE OF RECYCLED MATERIALS;
(3) PERFORMANCE AUDITS AND INSPECTIONS;
(4) REUSE AND REFURBISHMENT;
(5) WORKER HEALTH AND SAFETY REQUIREMENTS;
(6) MAINTENANCE OF LIABILITY INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL
ASSURANCES; AND
(7) ANY OTHER PRACTICES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN
REGULATION.
[(i–2)] (U) “Food residuals” means material derived from the processing or
discarding of food, including pre– and post–consumer vegetables, fruits, grains, dairy
products, and meats.
[(j) “Manufacturer” means a person that is the brand owner of a covered electronic
device sold or offered for sale in the State, by any means, including transactions conducted
through sales outlets, catalogs, or the Internet.]
[(k)] (V) (1) “Natural wood waste” means tree and other natural vegetative
refuse.

SENATE BILL 655 9
(2) “Natural wood waste” includes tree stumps, brush and limbs, root mats,
logs, and other natural vegetative material.
[(l)] (W) (1) “Natural wood waste recycling facility” means a facility where
recycling services for natural wood waste are provided.
(2) “Natural wood waste recycling facility” does not include a collection or
processing facility operated by:
(i) A nonprofit or governmental organization located in the State; or
(ii) A single individual or business that provides recycling services
for its own employees or for its own recyclable materials generated on its own premises.
[(m)] (X) “Office” means the Office of Recycling within the Department.
[(n)] (Y) (1) “Organics recycling” means any process in which organic
materials or compostable packaging materials are collected, separated, or processed and
returned to the marketplace in the form of raw materials or products.
(2) “Organics recycling” includes anaerobic digestion and composting.
[(o)] (Z) “Organics recycling facility” means a facility where organics recycling
takes place.
[(o–1)] (AA) “Paint stewardship assessment” means the amount added to the
purchase price of architectural paint sold in the State that is necessary to cover the Paint
Stewardship Program’s cost of collecting, transporting, and processing postconsumer paint
statewide.
[(o–2)] (BB) “Postconsumer paint” means architectural paint not used and no longer
wanted by a purchaser.
(CC) “PREMIUM SERVICE” MEANS A SERVICE SUCH AS AN AT–LOCATION
SYSTEM UPGRADE SERVICE, AN AT–HOME PICKUP SERVICE, OR A CURBSIDE PICKUP
SERVICE.
[(o–3)] (DD) “Producer” means a manufacturer of architectural paint that sells,
offers for sale, or distributes the paint in the State under the producer’s own name or brand.
[(p)] (EE) (1) “Recyclable materials” means those materials that:
(i) Would otherwise become solid waste for disposal in a refuse
disposal system; and

SENATE BILL 655
(ii) May be collected, separated, composted, or processed and
returned to the marketplace in the form of raw materials or products.
(2) “Recyclable materials” does not include incinerator ash.
[(q)] (FF) “Recycling” means any process in which recyclable materials are
collected, separated, or processed and returned to the marketplace in the form of raw
materials or products.
[(r)] (GG) “Recycling services” means the services provided by persons engaged in
the business of recycling, including the collection, processing, storage, purchase, sale, or
disposition of recyclable materials.
[(r–1)] (HH) “Refuse disposal system” has the meaning stated in § 9–201 of this title.
[(r–2)] (II) “Representative organization” means a nonprofit organization created
by producers to implement a Paint Stewardship Program.
[(r–3)] (JJ) “Retailer” means any person that offers architectural paint for sale at
retail in the State.
[(r–4)] (KK) “Sale” or “sell” means any transfer of title for consideration, including
remote sales conducted through sales outlets, catalogues, the Internet, or any other similar
electronic means.
(LL) “SMALL–SCALE SERVER” MEANS A COMPUTER THAT:
(1) TYPICALLY USES DESKTOP COMPONENTS IN A DESKTOP FORM
AND IS DESIGNED PRIMARILY TO SERVE AS A STORAGE HOST FOR OTHER
COMPUTERS; AND
(2) IS DESIGNED:
(I) IN A PEDESTAL, TOWER, OR OTHER FORM THAT IS SIMILAR
TO THAT OF A DESKTOP COMPUTER SO THAT ALL DATA PROCESSING, STORAGE, AND
NETWORK INTERFACING IS CONTAINED WITHIN ONE BOX OR PRODUCT;
(II) TO BE OPERATIONAL NEARLY 24 HOURS PER DAY AND 7
DAYS PER WEEK;
(III) TO BE CAPABLE OF OPERATING IN A SIMULTANEOUS
MULTI–USER ENVIRONMENT, SERVING SEVERAL USERS THROUGH NETWORKED
CLIENT UNITS; AND

SENATE BILL 655 11
(IV) TO BE AN INDUSTRY–ACCEPTED OPERATING SYSTEM FOR
HOME OR LOW–END SERVER APPLICATIONS.
[(s)] (MM) (1) “Solid waste stream” means garbage or refuse that would, unless
recycled, be disposed of in a refuse disposal system.
(2) “Solid waste stream” includes organic material capable of being
composted that is not composted in accordance with regulations adopted under § 9–1725(b)
of this subtitle.
(3) “Solid waste stream” does not include:
(i) Hospital waste;
(ii) Rubble;
(iii) Scrap material;
(iv) Land clearing debris;
(v) Sewage sludge; or
(vi) Waste generated by a single individual or business and disposed
of in a facility dedicated solely for that entity’s waste.
[(t)] (NN) (1) “Video display device” means an electronic device with an output
surface that displays or is capable of displaying moving graphical images or visual
representations of image sequences or pictures that show a number of quickly changing
images on a screen to create the illusion of motion.
(2) “Video display device” includes a device that is an integral part of the
display and cannot easily be removed from the display by the consumer and that produces
the moving image on the screen.
(3) A video display device may use a cathode–ray tube (CRT), liquid crystal
display (LCD), gas plasma, digital light processing, or other image–projection technology.
[(u)] (OO) “White goods” includes:
(1) Refrigerators;
(2) Stoves;
(3) Washing machines;
(4) Dryers;

SENATE BILL 655
(5) Water heaters; [and]
(6) Air conditioners; AND
(7) ANY OTHER APPLIANCES DESIGNATED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN
REGULATION.
[(v)] (PP) (1) “Yard waste” means organic plant waste derived from gardening,
landscaping, and tree trimming activities.
(2) “Yard waste” includes leaves, garden waste, lawn cuttings, weeds, and
prunings.
9–1707.
(f) (1) There is a State Recycling Trust Fund.
(2) The Fund shall consist of:
(i) The newsprint recycling incentive fee;
(ii) The telephone directory recycling incentive fee collected under §
9–1709 of this subtitle;
(iii) The [covered] electronic device [manufacturer] PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM PLAN AND ANNUAL REPORT AND registration [fee] AND
REVIEW FEES collected under [§ 9–1728] §§ 9–1728 AND 9–1728.4 of this subtitle;
(iv) The Paint Stewardship Program plan and annual report review
fees collected under § 9–1733(b) and (h) of this subtitle;
(v) Any fees collected from producer responsibility organizations
under § 9–1702.2 of this subtitle or Subtitle 25 of this title;
(vi) All fines and penalties collected under this subtitle and § 9–2512
of this title;
(vii) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; and
(viii) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit
of the Fund.
(3) The Secretary shall administer the Fund.
(4) The Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately and the Comptroller shall
account for the Fund.

SENATE BILL 655 13
(5) At the end of each fiscal year, any unspent or unencumbered balance in
the Fund that exceeds $2,000,000 shall revert to the General Fund of the State in
accordance with § 7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(6) In accordance with the State budget, the Fund shall be used only:
(i) To provide grants to the counties to be used by the counties to
develop and implement local recycling plans;
(ii) [To provide grants to counties that have addressed methods for
the separate collection and recycling of covered electronic devices in accordance with §
9–1703(c)(1) of this subtitle;
(iii) To provide grants to municipalities to be used by the
municipalities to implement local covered electronic device recycling programs;
(iv)] To cover the costs of the Paint Stewardship Program plan review
under § 9–1733(b) of this subtitle, the annual report review under § 9–1733(h) of this
subtitle, and associated costs for Program compliance oversight;
[(v)] (III) In accordance with paragraph (7) of this subsection, to
cover the costs of a statewide recycling needs assessment conducted under § 9–1702.2 of
this subtitle;
[(vi)] (IV) In accordance with paragraph (7) of this subsection, to
cover the costs of producer responsibility plan review, oversight, and enforcement under
Subtitle 25 of this title; [and]
(V) TO COVER THE COSTS OF THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM PLAN AND REPORT REVIEW UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE AND ASSOCIATED COSTS FOR PROGRAM OVERSIGHT AND OTHER RELATED
ADMINISTRATIVE AND ENFORCEMENT ACTIVITIES; AND
[(vii)] (VI) To carry out the purposes of the land management
administration.
(7) (i) There is a separate account within the Fund.
(ii) The separate account shall consist of:
1. Any fees collected from producer responsibility
organizations under § 9–1702.2 of this subtitle or Subtitle 25 of this title; and
2. All fines and penalties collected under § 9–2512 of this
title.

SENATE BILL 655
(iii) The separate account shall be used only for the costs of statewide
recycling needs assessments conducted under § 9–1702.2 of this subtitle and producer
responsibility plan review, oversight, and enforcement under Subtitle 25 of this title.
(8) (I) THERE SHALL BE A SEPARATE ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM PLAN AND ANNUAL REPORT AND
REGISTRATION AND REVIEW FEES ACCOUNT WITHIN THE FUND.
(II) THE ACCOUNT SHALL CONSIST OF THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM PLAN AND ANNUAL REPORT AND
REGISTRATION AND REVIEW FEES COLLECTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1728.4 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(III) THE ACCOUNT SHALL BE USED TO:
1. FUND THE COSTS OF ADMINISTERING,
IMPLEMENTING, AND ENFORCING THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1728.5 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
AND
2. REIMBURSE EXPENSES OF MEMBERS OF THE
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM ADVISORY COUNCIL
UNDER § 9–1728.6 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(8)] (9) (i) The Treasurer shall invest the money in the Fund in the
same manner as other State money may be invested.
(ii) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the
General Fund of the State.
9–1727.
(a) This section applies to [a] AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE manufacturer that sells
or offers for sale a new covered electronic device in the State.
(b) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, AN
ELECTRONIC DEVICE manufacturer may not sell or offer for sale to any person in the State
a new covered electronic device unless:
(1) THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER PARTICIPATES IN AN
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM THAT COMPLIES WITH
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE;

SENATE BILL 655 15
(2) The covered electronic device is labeled with the name of the
ELECTRONIC DEVICE manufacturer or the manufacturer’s brand label AND THE LABEL
IS PERMANENTLY AFFIXED AND EASILY VISIBLE; [and]
[(2)] (3) The ELECTRONIC DEVICE manufacturer has registered with
and, if applicable, submitted [a registration fee] AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM PLAN AND ANNUAL REPORT AND REGISTRATION AND
REVIEW FEES to the Department [as provided under this part]; AND
(4) THE BRAND IS INCLUDED IN AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM PLAN APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER IS NOT REQUIRED TO
PARTICIPATE IN AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM IN
A GIVEN YEAR IF THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER PROVIDES PROOF, TO
THE SATISFACTION OF THE DEPARTMENT, THAT THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE
MANUFACTURER SOLD LESS THAN 50 COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES IN THE STATE
DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
(D) THE FAILURE OF AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER TO SATISFY
ANY OF THE RESPONSIBILITIES DELEGATED TO IT BY AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION FOR DEVELOPING AND IMPLEMENTING
AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM DOES NOT RELIEVE
THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER OF THE MANUFACTURER’S
RESPONSIBILITY TO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
9–1728.
(A) (1) AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER SHALL REGISTER WITH
THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(2) THE REGISTRATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) BE IN A FORM DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) BE APPLICABLE FOR THE IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING
FISCAL YEAR.
[(a)] (B) [A covered] AN electronic device manufacturer’s registration shall
include:
(1) [The] A LIST OF ALL THE BRANDS OF ELECTRONIC DEVICES
MANUFACTURED, SOLD, OR IMPORTED BY THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE
MANUFACTURER, INCLUDING THE brand names under which the ELECTRONIC DEVICE

SENATE BILL 655
manufacturer sells or offers for sale covered electronic devices in the State, INCLUDING
THOSE SOLD OR OFFERED FOR SALE IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL
YEAR;
(2) [Whether the manufacturer has implemented a covered electronic
device takeback program;
(3) If the manufacturer has implemented a covered electronic device
takeback program:
(i) A toll–free number or Web site address that provides information
about the takeback program, including a detailed description of how a person may return
a covered electronic device for recycling, refurbishing, or reuse; and
(ii) One year after the implementation of the program and each year
thereafter, a report on the implementation of the program during the prior year, including:
1. The total weight of the covered electronic devices received
by the program from Maryland during the prior year;
2. The total number of covered electronic devices from
Maryland recycled, refurbished, and reused during the prior year; and
3. The processes and methods used to recycle, refurbish, or
reuse the covered electronic devices received from Maryland;
(4) The total number of covered electronic devices sold in the State in the
prior year, including:
(i) The types of covered electronic devices sold; and
(ii) The brand names under which the covered electronic devices
were sold] THE NAME OF THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER’S DESIGNATED
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION; and
[(5)] (3) Any additional information required by the Department in
regulation.
[(b) The registration shall:
(1) Be submitted to the Department by March 1 of each year; and
(2) If the manufacturer has implemented a covered electronic device
takeback program, be updated prior to any significant change in the program.]

SENATE BILL 655 17
(c) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
[covered] electronic device manufacturer registration fee shall be paid by [a] AN
ELECTRONIC DEVICE manufacturer in accordance with this subsection.
(2) [For the initial registration by a manufacturer, the] THE registration
fee is:
(i) $10,000 for [a] AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE manufacturer that
sold at least 1,000 covered electronic devices in the State in the prior year; and
(ii) $5,000 for [a] AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE manufacturer that sold
at least 100 but not more than 999 covered electronic devices in the State in the prior year.
[(3) For each subsequent annual registration by a manufacturer that did
not have an implemented covered electronic device takeback program in the prior year, the
registration fee is:
(i) 1. On or after March 1, 2013, and before March 1, 2016,
$10,000 for a manufacturer that sold at least 1,000 covered electronic devices in the State
in the prior year; and
2. On or after March 1, 2016, $5,000 for a manufacturer that
sold at least 1,000 covered electronic devices in the State in the prior year; and
(ii) $5,000 for a manufacturer that sold at least 100 but not more
than 999 covered electronic devices in the State in the prior year.
(4) For each subsequent annual registration by a manufacturer that had
an implemented covered electronic device takeback program in the prior year, the
registration fee is $500.]
[(5)] (3) There is no registration fee for [a] AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE
manufacturer that sold less than 100 covered electronic devices in the State in the prior
year.
[(6)] (4) The registration fee required under this subsection shall:
(i) Be submitted to the Department [by March 1 of each year] ON
OR BEFORE MARCH 1, 2027; and
(ii) Be paid into the ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM PLAN AND ANNUAL REPORT AND REGISTRATION AND
REVIEW FEES ACCOUNT WITHIN THE State Recycling Trust Fund.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADJUST THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE
MANUFACTURER REGISTRATION FEE BY REGULATION.

SENATE BILL 655
(6) BEGINNING MARCH 1, 2029, AND EACH MARCH 1 THEREAFTER,
EACH ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION SHALL PAY
THE FEE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
[(d) (1) The Department shall:
(i) Review the registration submitted under this section; and
(ii) If the registration does not meet the requirements of this section
and the regulations adopted by the Department under this subtitle, notify the
manufacturer of the insufficiency.
(2) Within 60 days after receipt of a notice of insufficiency, the
manufacturer shall submit a revised registration that addresses the insufficiencies noted
by the Department.
(e) The Department shall maintain a list of registered covered electronic device
manufacturers on its Web site.
(f) The sales data submitted in accordance with subsection (a)(4) of this section
shall be treated as confidential and proprietary, and may not be disclosed except as
otherwise required by law.]
9–1728.1.
(a) [In this section, “retailer” means any person that sells a covered electronic
device to a consumer.
(b)] If [a] AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE manufacturer is subject to the requirements
of §§ 9–1727 and 9–1728 of this [part, a] SUBTITLE, AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE retailer
may not sell or offer for sale to any person in the State a new covered electronic device
manufactured by the ELECTRONIC DEVICE manufacturer, unless:
(1) THE COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE IS LABELED WITH A BRAND
AND THE LABEL IS PERMANENTLY AFFIXED AND READILY VISIBLE;
(2) THE BRAND IS INCLUDED ON THE LIST MADE PUBLICLY
AVAILABLE BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) THE LIST MADE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE BY THE DEPARTMENT
SPECIFIES THAT the ELECTRONIC DEVICE manufacturer has complied with the
requirements of §§ 9–1727 and 9–1728 of this [part] SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 655 19
(B) (1) AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE RETAILER SHALL PROVIDE TO A
CONSUMER AT THE TIME OF THE SALE OF A COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE
INFORMATION FROM THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE THAT PROVIDES DETAILS ABOUT
WHERE AND HOW A CONSUMER CAN RECYCLE, REUSE, OR REFURBISH COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICES IN THE STATE.
(2) THE INFORMATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE:
(I) FOR IN–STORE SALES, PROVIDED IN PRINTED FORM ON THE
RECEIPT, WITH A WEBSITE ADDRESS, TOLL–FREE TELEPHONE NUMBER, OR QR
CODE, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) FOR INTERNET SALES, IN PRINTABLE FORM.
[9–1728.2.
(a) A manufacturer that has implemented a covered electronic device takeback
program shall include educational and instructional materials relating to the destruction
and sanitization of data from a covered electronic device:
(1) With each new covered electronic device sold or offered for sale in the
State;
(2) On the manufacturer’s covered electronic device takeback program Web
site; or
(3) As information provided through the manufacturer’s covered electronic
device takeback program toll–free number.
(b) A manufacturer that is participating in a covered electronic device takeback
program established by a group of covered electronic device manufacturers shall be
considered as having implemented a covered electronic device takeback program under this
part.]
9–1728.2.
(A) (1) AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION, OR IF APPLICABLE, AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE COORDINATING BODY,
SHALL CONSULT WITH THE DEPARTMENT TO DEVELOP EDUCATIONAL AND
INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS, RESOURCES, AND PUBLIC AWARENESS ACTIVITIES TO
ADVERTISE AND PROMOTE, ON A REGULAR BASIS:
(I) THE RECYCLING, REUSE, AND REFURBISHMENT OF
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES;

SENATE BILL 655
(II) THE DESTRUCTION AND SANITIZATION OF DATA FROM
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES; AND
(III) COLLECTION OPPORTUNITIES IN THE STATE.
(2) AT MINIMUM, AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION SHALL:
(I) PROMOTE RECYCLING, REUSE, AND REFURBISHMENT OF
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES THROUGH AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM;
(II) ESTABLISH A TOLL–FREE TELEPHONE NUMBER AND
WEBSITE ADDRESS THAT A COVERED ENTITY MAY USE TO CONTACT THE
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION ABOUT THE
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM;
(III) PUBLICIZE INFORMATION ON THE LOCATION OF
COLLECTION SITES AND ALL OTHER COLLECTION SERVICES OFFERED BY THE
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM; AND
(IV) ENGAGE WITH AND WORK TO SUSTAIN HIGH AWARENESS OF
THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM IN MINORITY,
LOW–INCOME, RURAL, AND HISTORICALLY UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES.
(3) AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION, OR IF APPLICABLE, AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE COORDINATING BODY,
SHALL PROVIDE EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS UNDER THIS SECTION TO COVERED
ENTITIES TO PROVIDE WITH EACH NEW COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE SOLD OR
OFFERED FOR SALE IN THE STATE:
(I) IN MULTIPLE LANGUAGES, AS DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, AND IN FORMATS THAT COMPLY WITH THE FEDERAL AMERICANS
WITH DISABILITIES ACT; AND
(II) ON PRINTED MATERIALS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1728.1
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) IF THE DEPARTMENT APPROVES MORE THAN ONE ELECTRONIC
DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM PLAN, EACH ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION SHALL, IN CONSULTATION WITH AN
APPLICABLE ELECTRONIC DEVICE COORDINATING BODY AND THE DEPARTMENT,
COORDINATE WITH ALL OTHER ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATIONS TO IMPLEMENT ONGOING PUBLIC AWARENESS ACTIVITIES TO

SENATE BILL 655 21
ENSURE THAT COVERED ENTITIES CAN EASILY IDENTIFY, UNDERSTAND, AND
ACCESS THE SERVICES PROVIDED BY ALL ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAMS IN THE STATE.
(2) PUBLIC AWARENESS ACTIVITIES UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL:
(I) UTILIZE A STATEWIDE SYSTEM OF PROMOTION THAT
ALLOWS COVERED ENTITIES TO EASILY UNDERSTAND THAT ALL ELECTRONIC
DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS ARE PROVIDING SERVICES
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) OTHERWISE SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION.
9–1728.3.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND IN THE
FORM AND MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE DEPARTMENT, AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION SHALL ANNUALLY SUBMIT TO THE
DEPARTMENT A PLAN FOR IMPLEMENTING AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM.
(2) MULTIPLE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATIONS MAY COORDINATE THEIR RESPECTIVE PLANS PRIOR TO
SUBMITTING THEIR PLANS TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) (1) A PLAN REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL DESCRIBE HOW THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION WILL IMPLEMENT AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM THAT COMPLIES WITH THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING HOW
THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION WILL:
(I) FINANCE, MANAGE, AND CONDUCT A STATEWIDE PROGRAM
TO COLLECT ALL MAKES AND MODELS OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES FROM
COVERED ENTITIES IN THE STATE;
(II) PROVIDE FOR ENVIRONMENTALLY SOUND MANAGEMENT
PRACTICES TO COLLECT, TRANSPORT, AND RECYCLE, REFURBISH, OR REUSE
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES;

SENATE BILL 655
(III) PROVIDE FOR ADVERTISING AND PROMOTION OF
COLLECTION OPPORTUNITIES THROUGHOUT THE STATE AND ON A REGULAR BASIS,
AS DESCRIBED IN § 9–1728.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(IV) PROVIDE CONVENIENT AND EQUITABLE SERVICE
THROUGHOUT THE STATE, THAT INCLUDES, AT A MINIMUM, CONVENIENT SERVICE
THROUGH A NETWORK OF COLLECTION SITES DISTRIBUTED TO ENSURE THAT 95%
OF THE RESIDENTS OF THE STATE ARE WITHIN 15 MILES OF A COLLECTION SITE
AVAILABLE FOR THEIR USE AS FOLLOWS:
1. IN EACH COUNTY THAT HAS A POPULATION OF LESS
THAN 100,000 RESIDENTS, AT LEAST ONE COLLECTION SITE;
2. IN EACH COUNTY THAT HAS A POPULATION OF AT
LEAST 100,000 RESIDENTS AND LESS THAN 200,000 RESIDENTS, AT LEAST TWO
COLLECTION SITES;
3. IN EACH COUNTY THAT HAS A POPULATION OF AT
LEAST 200,000 RESIDENTS, AT LEAST THREE COLLECTION SITES;
4. IN EACH CITY OR MUNICIPALITY WITH A POPULATION
OF AT LEAST 10,000 RESIDENTS BUT LESS THAN 200,000 RESIDENTS, AT LEAST ONE
COLLECTION SITE, PLUS ONE ADDITIONAL COLLECTION SITE FOR EVERY
ADDITIONAL 20,000 RESIDENTS; AND
5. IN EACH CITY OR MUNICIPALITY WITH A POPULATION
OF 200,000 RESIDENTS OR MORE, AT LEAST 10 COLLECTION SITES, PLUS ONE
ADDITIONAL COLLECTION SITE FOR EVERY ADDITIONAL 50,000 RESIDENTS;
(V) ENSURE CONTINUOUS IMPROVEMENT OF THE ELECTRONIC
DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM BY:
1. ESTABLISHING AND WORKING TO ACHIEVE
MEASURABLE PROGRAM GOALS FOR:
A. COLLECTION, INCLUDING AMOUNT COLLECTED OR
USAGE RATES OF COLLECTION SERVICES; AND
B. MAINTAINING HIGH PUBLIC AWARENESS OF THE
PROGRAM;
2. CONSISTENTLY EVALUATING DEVICES DEFINED AS
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES; AND

SENATE BILL 655 23
3. FOR ANY CALENDAR YEAR DURING WHICH A
PROGRAM GOAL WAS NOT MET, DESCRIBING, WITH SUPPORTING DATA, WHAT
CHANGES OR STEPS THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION WILL UNDERTAKE THAT CAN ENSURE THE PROGRAM ACHIEVES ITS
GOALS IN THE FOLLOWING CALENDAR YEAR;
(VI) IF APPLICABLE, COORDINATE WITH ALL OTHER
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS THROUGH AN
ELECTRONIC DEVICE COORDINATING BODY; AND
(VII) COORDINATE ACTIVITIES WITH RECYCLING,
REFURBISHMENT, AND REUSE PROGRAMS, INCLUDING NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATIONS, THAT RECYCLE, REFURBISH, OR REUSE TECHNOLOGY IN ORDER
TO FURTHER THE ENVIRONMENTALLY SOUND MANAGEMENT PRACTICES OF
RECYCLING, REUSE, AND REFURBISHMENT OF ELECTRONIC DEVICES.
(2) (I) A PLAN UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY
ALLOW A COLLECTION SITE FOR A COUNTY TO BE THE SAME AS A COLLECTION SITE
FOR A CITY OR MUNICIPALITY IN THE COUNTY IF THE RESIDENTS OF THE
APPLICABLE CITY OR MUNICIPALITY ARE ABLE TO UTILIZE THE COUNTY
COLLECTION SITE.
(II) COLLECTION SITES SHALL BE STAFFED AND OPEN TO THE
PUBLIC AT A FREQUENCY ADEQUATE TO MEET THE NEEDS OF THE AREA BEING
SERVICED.
(III) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE THE REQUIREMENTS OF A
PLAN UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION WITH RESPECT TO COUNTY, CITY,
OR MUNICIPAL COLLECTION SITES IF THE PROPOSED PLAN DEMONSTRATES TO THE
SATISFACTION OF THE DEPARTMENT THAT ALTERNATIVE SERVICES OR
COLLECTION SITES WOULD PROVIDE SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT COLLECTION
CONVENIENCE.
(C) IN ADDITION TO THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION, AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM
PLAN SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A LIST OF ALL PROCESSORS THAT WILL BE USED BY THE
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM;
(2) THE CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION;

SENATE BILL 655
(3) A LIST OF ALL ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURERS
PARTICIPATING IN THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
PROGRAM;
(4) A LIST OF ALL BRANDS OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES
MANUFACTURED, SOLD, OR IMPORTED BY EACH PARTICIPATING ELECTRONIC
DEVICE MANUFACTURER, INCLUDING:
(I) BRANDS BEING OFFERED FOR SALE IN THE STATE BY EACH
ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER; AND
(II) BRANDS THAT WERE OFFERED FOR SALE IN THE STATE BY
EACH ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER DURING THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR;
(5) A LIST OF EACH COUNTY, CITY, OR MUNICIPALITY THAT HAS
ELECTED TO PARTICIPATE IN THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM DURING THE PROGRAM YEAR; AND
(6) FOR EACH COUNTY, CITY, OR MUNICIPALITY, THE LOCATION OF
EACH PROGRAM COLLECTION SITE.
(D) AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION
SHALL:
(1) EXCEPT FOR AN ALLOWABLE CHARGE FOR PREMIUM SERVICES,
PROVIDE FOR COLLECTION, TRANSPORTATION, REUSE, REFURBISHMENT, AND
RECYCLING OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES FOR COVERED ENTITIES FREE OF
CHARGE;
(2) IMPLEMENT THE PLAN REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION;
(3) PROVIDE FAIR FINANCIAL COMPENSATION TO COLLECTION SITES
CALCULATED TO COVER THE COSTS OF COLLECTING, STORING, MANAGING, AND
TRANSPORTING COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES;
(4) ENTER INTO AGREEMENTS WITH ALL WILLING PUBLIC SECTOR
AGENCIES AND COLLECTION ENTITIES TO COVER THE COSTS OF COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICE RECYCLING AGREEMENTS;
(5) IN THE FORM AND MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE DEPARTMENT,
PROVIDE AN ANNUAL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT THAT:

SENATE BILL 655 25
(I) INCLUDES THE TOTAL WEIGHT OF COVERED ELECTRONIC
DEVICES, INCLUDING PERIPHERALS, COLLECTED FROM COVERED ENTITIES IN THE
STATE IN THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM DURING
THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR, DISAGGREGATED BY:
1. TYPE OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE;
2. COLLECTION SITE OR GROUP OF COLLECTION SITES;
AND
3. METHOD OF COLLECTION, INCLUDING COLLECTION
BY PREMIUM SERVICES;
(II) INCLUDES A LIST OF ALL COLLECTION SITES AND
PROCESSORS USED BY THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
PROGRAM;
(III) INCLUDES THE RESULTS OF ANY APPROVED ALTERNATIVE
METHODS OF SERVICE IN ADEQUATELY MEETING THE NEEDS OF THE APPLICABLE
JURISDICTION, INCLUDING THE DATE OR TIME FRAME OF EACH ALTERNATIVE
SERVICE EVENT OR PROGRAM AND THE TOTAL WEIGHT OF EACH TYPE OF COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICE, INCLUDING PERIPHERALS, COLLECTED AT EACH
ALTERNATIVE SERVICE EVENT OR PROGRAM; AND
(IV) DETAILS HOW THE PLAN REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION
WAS IMPLEMENTED DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR, INCLUDING:
1. A DESCRIPTION OF HOW THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION COMPLIED WITH THE ELECTRONIC
DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM PLAN, INCLUDING WHETHER GOALS
WERE MET, A SUMMARY OF PUBLIC AWARENESS ACTIVITIES, AND COPIES OF PUBLIC
AWARENESS MATERIALS DEVELOPED BY THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION;
2. A SUMMARY OF ANY SAFETY OR SECURITY PROBLEMS
THAT OCCURRED DURING THE COLLECTION, TRANSPORTATION, OR REUSE,
REFURBISHMENT, RECYCLING, OR DISPOSAL OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES
AND THE ACTUAL OR POTENTIAL FUTURE RESOLUTIONS OF THOSE PROBLEMS; AND
3. AN ATTESTATION THAT ALL COVERED ELECTRONIC
DEVICES COLLECTED UNDER THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
PROGRAM WERE COLLECTED AND PROCESSED IN COMPLIANCE WITH ALL

SENATE BILL 655
APPLICABLE LAWS, RULES, AND REGULATIONS AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH
ENVIRONMENTALLY SOUND MANAGEMENT STANDARDS;
(6) RETAIN ALL RECORDS RELATED TO THE IMPLEMENTATION AND
ADMINISTRATION OF THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
PROGRAM FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE RECORD WAS CREATED AND
MAKE THE RECORDS AVAILABLE FOR INSPECTION AND AUDIT BY THE DEPARTMENT
ON REQUEST;
(7) ON REQUEST FROM THE DEPARTMENT, PROVIDE THE CONTACT
INFORMATION AND A POINT OF CONTACT FOR EACH ELECTRONIC DEVICE
MANUFACTURER PARTICIPATING IN THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM; AND
(8) ALLOW A COLLECTION SITE TO RECOVER COLLECTED COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICES FOR REFURBISHMENT AND RESALE AT RETAIL.
(E) AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION
MAY REQUIRE A COLLECTION SITE TO EXCLUDE THE WEIGHT OF COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICES RECOVERED FOR REFURBISHMENT OR RESALE FROM THE
TOTAL WEIGHT OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES COLLECTED BY THE
COLLECTION SITE FOR THE PURPOSES OF ANNUAL REPORTING AND DETERMINING
COMPENSATION FOR THE COLLECTION AND MANAGEMENT OF COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICES, UNLESS:
(1) THE COLLECTION SITE IS A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT
REFURBISHES TECHNOLOGIES FOR RESALE AND RECOVERS THE COLLECTED
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE FOR RESALE AT RETAIL; OR
(2) THE COLLECTION SITE RECOVERS THE COLLECTED COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICE FOR DONATION TO AN ORGANIZATION THAT REFURBISHES
TECHNOLOGIES FOR RESALE AT RETAIL.
(F) (1) PRIOR TO REMOVING A COLLECTION SITE FROM AN ELECTRONIC
DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM, AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION SHALL WORK WITH OTHER
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS OR THE
ELECTRONIC DEVICE COORDINATING BODY, IF APPLICABLE, TO DETERMINE
WHETHER THE COLLECTION SITE CAN BE ADDED TO ANOTHER ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM.
(2) (I) IF THE COLLECTION SITE CANNOT BE ADDED TO ANOTHER
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM, THE ELECTRONIC

SENATE BILL 655 27
DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION SHALL, AT LEAST 90 DAYS
BEFORE THE DATE OF REMOVAL:
1. PROVIDE NOTICE TO COVERED ENTITIES BY POSTING
NOTICE OF THE REMOVAL ON THE PROGRAM WEBSITE; AND
2. PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE DEPARTMENT
AND ALL OTHER COLLECTION SITES IN THE WASTESHED.
(II) IF THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION DOES NOT PROVIDE THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH, AND UNLESS THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION DEMONSTRATES GOOD CAUSE FOR BEING UNABLE TO PROVIDE THE
NOTICE, THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION TO RETAIN A COLLECTION SITE.
(G) EACH ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION SHALL WORK WITH THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE COORDINATING BODY
AND WITH ALL OTHER ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATIONS TO ENSURE THE RECONCILIATION OF FINANCIAL OBLIGATIONS
UNDER § 9–1728.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(H) AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION
OR AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE COORDINATING BODY MAY, AFTER NOTICE TO THE
ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER, REFER THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE
MANUFACTURER TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR POTENTIAL VIOLATIONS OF THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
9–1728.4.
(A) (1) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT A REPORT SUBMITTED
UNDER § 9–1728.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE SATISFIES THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL APPROVE THE REPORT.
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT DOES NOT APPROVE A REPORT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION WITH WRITTEN
NOTICE OF REVISIONS NECESSARY FOR APPROVAL AND THE TIMELINE TO
RESUBMIT.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL APPROVE AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM PLAN IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES
THAT THE PLAN SATISFIES THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 9–1728.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 655
(2) WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE DEPARTMENT
RECEIVES AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM PLAN,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL EITHER APPROVE THE PLAN, APPROVE THE PLAN WITH
CONDITIONS, OR DENY THE PLAN.
(3) (I) IF THE DEPARTMENT DENIES THE PLAN, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL PROVIDE THE REASON OR REASONS FOR THE DENIAL AND REQUEST THAT
THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION SUBMIT A
REVISED PLAN TO THE DEPARTMENT WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER THE DATE THAT THE
DEPARTMENT DENIES THE PLAN.
(II) WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A REVISED PLAN UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL EITHER
APPROVE THE REVISED PLAN, APPROVE THE REVISED PLAN WITH CONDITIONS, OR
DENY THE REVISED PLAN.
(III) IF THE DEPARTMENT DENIES A REVISED PLAN, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY:
1. REQUIRE THAT THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION FURTHER REVISE THE PLAN IN ACCORDANCE WITH
A TIMELINE DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
2. DIRECT SPECIFIC CHANGES TO THE REVISED PLAN;
OR
3. DIRECT THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER
OR MANUFACTURERS ON WHOSE BEHALF THE REVISED PLAN WAS SUBMITTED TO
REGISTER WITH AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION WITH AN APPROVED PLAN.
(IV) IF THE DEPARTMENT DIRECTS SPECIFIC CHANGES TO A
REVISED PLAN UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III)2 OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION SHALL:
1. IMPLEMENT THE SPECIFIC CHANGES; OR
2. REQUEST A HEARING.
(C) (1) IF THE DEPARTMENT APPROVES MORE THAN ONE ELECTRONIC
DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SET A

SENATE BILL 655 29
TIMELINE FOR ALL ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATIONS TO DESIGNATE AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE COORDINATING BODY.
(2) IF ALL APPLICABLE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS ARE UNABLE TO DESIGNATE AN ELECTRONIC
DEVICE COORDINATING BODY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TIMELINE SET BY THE
DEPARTMENT, THE DEPARTMENT MAY EITHER:
(I) DESIGNATE AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE COORDINATING BODY;
OR
(II) EXTEND THE TIMELINE FOR ALL ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS TO DESIGNATE AN ELECTRONIC
DEVICE COORDINATING BODY.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE CHANGES TO AN APPROVED
PLAN UNDER THIS SECTION TO ENSURE THAT ALL APPROVED PLANS PROVIDE FOR
A CONSISTENT MEANS OF ENABLING COORDINATION BETWEEN ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS.
(4) THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE COORDINATING BODY, OR AN
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION IF AN
ELECTRONIC DEVICE COORDINATING BODY IS NOT DESIGNATED UNDER THIS
SECTION, SHALL ANNUALLY CALCULATE EACH ELECTRONIC DEVICE
MANUFACTURER OBLIGATION BY:
(I) MULTIPLYING THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER’S
MARKET SHARE FOR EACH ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCT CATEGORY BY THE
PRODUCT CATEGORY’S PERCENTAGE OF THE TOTAL WEIGHT OF ALL COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICES RECYCLED DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
CALENDAR YEAR; AND
(II) ADDING THE PERCENTAGES CALCULATED UNDER ITEM (I)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(5) THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE COORDINATING BODY SHALL:
(I) ANNUALLY RECONCILE THE FINANCIAL OBLIGATIONS
BETWEEN ALL ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS;
AND
(II) CONDUCT ANY OTHER COORDINATION BETWEEN
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS.

SENATE BILL 655
(D) (1) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH BY REGULATION AN
ANNUAL REPORT AND REGISTRATION AND REVIEW FEES, REASONABLY
CALCULATED TO COVER THE COSTS TO THE DEPARTMENT OF IMPLEMENTING,
ADMINISTERING, AND ENFORCING THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
(II) BEGINNING MARCH 1, 2029, AND EACH MARCH 1
THEREAFTER, EACH ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION SHALL SUBMIT THE ANNUAL REPORT AND REGISTRATION AND
REVIEW FEES TO THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) (I) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1, 2029, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
ESTABLISH BY REGULATION A ONE–TIME PLAN REVIEW FEE, REASONABLY
CALCULATED TO COVER THE COSTS TO THE DEPARTMENT OF REVIEWING AN
INITIAL ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM PLAN.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT APPROVE AN INITIAL
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM PLAN IF THE
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION HAS NOT PAID
THE ONE–TIME PLAN REVIEW FEE.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN AND MAKE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE:
(1) A LIST OF REGISTERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURERS
AND THEIR BRANDS;
(2) A LIST OF BRANDS FOR WHICH NO ELECTRONIC DEVICE
MANUFACTURER HAS REGISTERED;
(3) A LIST THAT IDENTIFIES WHICH ELECTRONIC DEVICE
MANUFACTURERS ARE IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(4) ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM
PLANS OR REVISED PLANS SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(5) REPORTS SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
(F) (1) FOR EACH PROGRAM YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
DETERMINE EACH ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER’S MARKET SHARE FOR
EACH ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCT CATEGORY.

SENATE BILL 655 31
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY:
(I) USE NATIONAL MARKET DATA PRORATED FOR THE STATE,
RETAIL OR MANUFACTURER DATA, CONSUMER RESEARCH, OR ANY DATA FROM THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR, AS DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, TO DETERMINE THE MARKET SHARE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) REQUIRE AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER TO
SUBMIT SALES OR OTHER DATA REGARDING THE NUMBER AND WEIGHT OF COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICES SOLD IN THE STATE BY THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE
MANUFACTURER.
(3) FOR EACH CALENDAR YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE EACH ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER’S
MARKET SHARE TO THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER’S ELECTRONIC
DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION OR TO THE APPLICABLE
ELECTRONIC DEVICE COORDINATING BODY; AND
(II) MAINTAIN ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE, IN A
PRINTABLE FORMAT, INFORMATION ON COLLECTION OPPORTUNITIES FOR
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES, INCLUDING COLLECTION SITE LOCATIONS AND
HOURS.
9–1728.5.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM.
(B) (1) THERE IS AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO FACILITATE THE COLLECTION
AND RECYCLING, REFURBISHING, OR REUSE OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES IN
THE STATE.
(D) THE PROGRAM SHALL BE FUNDED BY THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM PLAN AND ANNUAL REPORT REGISTRATION
AND REVIEW FEE ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED WITHIN THE STATE RECYCLING TRUST
FUND UNDER § 9–1707(F)(8) OF THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 655
(E) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM ADVISORY COUNCIL ESTABLISHED UNDER §
9–1728.6 OF THIS SUBTITLE, MAY BY REGULATION:
(1) DETERMINE REASONABLE RECYCLING FEES; AND
(2) AMEND OR EXPAND:
(I) THE DEFINITION OF “COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE” AS
DEFINED IN § 9–1701 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) THE DEFINITION OF “WHITE GOODS” AS DEFINED IN §
9–1701 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
9–1728.6.
(A) THERE IS AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL IS TO ADVISE THE
DEPARTMENT ON THE ENFORCEMENT, REGULATION, IMPLEMENTATION, AND
ADMINISTRATION OF THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1728.5 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, OR THE MEMBER’S
DESIGNEE, APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(2) ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, OR THE MEMBER’S
DESIGNEE, APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(3) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE; AND
(4) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY:
(I) AT LEAST TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF THE MARYLAND
ASSOCIATION OF COUNTIES, INCLUDING:
1. ONE REPRESENTING A RURAL COUNTY; AND
2. ONE REPRESENTING A SUBURBAN OR AN URBAN
COUNTY;

SENATE BILL 655 33
(II) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND MUNICIPAL
LEAGUE;
(III) AT LEAST ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF ELECTRONIC DEVICE
RECYCLERS IN THE STATE;
(IV) AT LEAST ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF ELECTRONIC DEVICE
MANUFACTURERS IN THE STATE;
(V) AT LEAST ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF ELECTRONIC DEVICE
RETAILERS IN THE STATE;
(VI) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND
ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE;
(VII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE NORTHEAST MARYLAND
WASTE DISPOSAL AUTHORITY;
(VIII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A NONPROFIT ENVIRONMENTAL
ADVOCACY ORGANIZATION THAT HAS EXPERIENCE WITH EXTENDED PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY LAWS;
(IX) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND RECYCLING
NETWORK; AND
(X) ANY OTHER MEMBER AS DETERMINED BY THE SECRETARY.
(D) FROM AMONG THE ADVISORY COUNCIL MEMBERS, THE SECRETARY
SHALL DESIGNATE TWO MEMBERS TO SERVE AS COCHAIRS OF THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL.
(F) A MEMBER OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
ADVISORY COUNCIL; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES:

SENATE BILL 655
(I) UNDER THE STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS
PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET; AND
(II) FROM THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM PLAN AND ANNUAL REPORT REGISTRATION AND REVIEW
FEE ACCOUNT IN THE STATE RECYCLING TRUST FUND.
(G) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL MEET AT THE REQUEST OF THE
SECRETARY.
(H) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL:
(1) REVIEW AND COMMENT ON DRAFT AND FINAL REGULATIONS
RELEVANT TO THE IMPLEMENTATION AND ADMINISTRATION OF THE ELECTRONIC
DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM; AND
(2) STUDY AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING:
(I) CHANGES TO THE DEFINITION OF “COVERED ELECTRONIC
DEVICE” AS DEFINED IN § 9–1701 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER AND ELECTRONIC
DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM PLANS AND ANNUAL REPORTS,
REGISTRATIONS, AND REVIEW FEES COLLECTED EACH YEAR;
(III) IF DETERMINED NECESSARY BY THE DEPARTMENT,
REASONABLE MINIMUMS OR CAPS ON:
1. FAIR FINANCIAL COMPENSATION TO RECYCLERS,
CALCULATED TO COVER THE COSTS OF COLLECTION, RECYCLING, REUSE, OR
REFURBISHMENT OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES; AND
2. FAIR FINANCIAL COMPENSATION TO ELECTRONIC
DEVICE COLLECTORS, CALCULATED TO COVER THE COSTS OF COLLECTION,
STORING, MANAGING, AND TRANSPORTING COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES,
INCLUDING STAFFING, STORAGE AND EQUIPMENT, AND APPROPRIATE CONTAINERS
FOR DAMAGED, DEFECTIVE, AND RECALLED COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES;
(IV) STANDARDS AND COMMON INDUSTRY CERTIFICATIONS TO
BE USED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN DEVELOPING AND APPROVING APPLICATION
MATERIALS AND PROCEDURES FOR ELECTRONIC DEVICE COLLECTORS,
RECYCLERS, AND PROCESSORS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1728.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE;

SENATE BILL 655 35
(V) THE CONVENIENCE AND AVAILABILITY OF DROP–OFF SITES
FOR ELECTRONIC DEVICES IN THE STATE, INCLUDING AN EVALUATION OF THE
FEASIBILITY AND COSTS OF INCREASING PUBLIC ACCESS TO ADDITIONAL DROP–OFF
SITES, MAILBACK PROGRAMS, AND PREMIUM SERVICES FOR PURPOSES OF
DEVELOPING ADOPTION AND CONVENIENCE TARGETS FOR EACH METHOD;
(VI) THE REUSE, REFURBISHMENT, AND RECYCLABILITY OF
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES AND OTHER DEVICES UNDER CONSIDERATION TO
BE DEFINED AS COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES;
(VII) THE NEED FOR APPLICABLE ELECTRONIC DEVICE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS TO PROVIDE FAIR FINANCIAL
COMPENSATION TO ELECTRONIC DEVICE COLLECTORS, CALCULATED TO COVER
THE COSTS OF HEAT, SMOKE, GAS, AND FIRE DETECTION, SUPPRESSION, AND
EXTINGUISHING SYSTEMS FOR COLLECTION SITES AND SOLID WASTE COLLECTION
VEHICLES OR OTHER INFRASTRUCTURE;
(VIII) THE NEED FOR ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS TO PROVIDE FAIR FINANCIAL COMPENSATION TO
ELECTRONIC DEVICE COLLECTORS, CALCULATED TO COVER THE COSTS OF AND, IF
APPLICABLE, FINANCIAL COMPENSATION FOR REQUIRED INFRASTRUCTURE AND
PREMIUM SERVICE OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES;
(IX) FAIR FINANCIAL COMPENSATION TO THE DEPARTMENT,
AND ELECTRONIC DEVICE COLLECTORS FOR ELECTRONIC DEVICE RECYCLING
EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS AND CAMPAIGNS, INCLUDING ONLINE, TELEVISION,
RADIO, BILLBOARD, PUBLIC TRANSIT OR OTHER ADVERTISEMENTS, AUTOMOTIVE
WRAPS OR DECALS, MAILERS, EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS AND SIGNAGE AT SOLID
WASTE COLLECTION SITES, PUBLIC EVENTS, OR RETAIL ESTABLISHMENTS;
(X) THE NEED FOR A DISPOSAL OR LANDFILL BAN ON COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICES; AND
(XI) ANY OTHER RELATED TOPICS AS REQUESTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(I) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON OR
BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2028, AND EACH DECEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL SHALL REPORT THE FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL TO THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) (I) RECOMMENDATIONS SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO BE CONSENSUS RECOMMENDATIONS.

SENATE BILL 655
(II) IF MULTIPLE RECOMMENDATIONS ARE SUBMITTED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION, EACH RECOMMENDATION SHALL INDICATE EACH MEMBER IN
FAVOR OF THE RECOMMENDATION.
9–1729.
(A) The Department may adopt regulations necessary to implement AND
ADMINISTER the provisions of this subtitle[, including the required components of a
covered electronic device takeback program].
(B) REGULATIONS ADOPTED TO IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THE
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SUBTITLE MAY:
(1) ESTABLISH APPLICATION MATERIALS AND PROCEDURES FOR
ELECTRONIC DEVICE COLLECTORS, RECYCLERS, AND PROCESSORS;
(2) INCORPORATE RECOMMENDATIONS SUBMITTED BY THE
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ADVISORY COUNCIL INTO
REASONABLE CHANGES TO THE ELECTRONIC DEVICE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
PROGRAM; AND
(3) INCLUDE:
(I) STANDARDS, SUCH AS COMMON INDUSTRY
CERTIFICATIONS, FOR ENVIRONMENTALLY SOUND MANAGEMENT PRACTICES FOR
RECYCLERS AND PROCESSORS; AND
(II) STANDARDS FOR PARTICIPATING COLLECTION SITES.
9–1730.
(a) The provisions and penalties of § 9–342 of this title shall be used and shall
apply to enforce violations of this part.
(b) (1) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, the Department may
assess against any ELECTRONIC DEVICE retailer that violates [§ 9–1728.1(b)] § 9–1728.1
of this [part] SUBTITLE a fine up to $1,000 for each violation, but not exceeding $10,000
total.
(2) A fine under paragraph (1) of this subsection may be assessed only after
the ELECTRONIC DEVICE retailer that committed the violation has been issued three
warnings regarding the violation.

SENATE BILL 655 37
(3) Each day on which a violation occurs or continues is a separate violation
under this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before December 1, 2026, the Department of the Environment shall
notify manufacturers of covered electronic devices of the electronic device producer
responsibility program as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(b) The Department of the Environment shall:
(1) evaluate any federal law that establishes a national program for the
collection and recycling, reuse, and refurbishment of electronic devices; and
(2) if the Department determines that the federal law evaluated under
item (1) of this subsection substantially meets or exceeds the requirements and intent of
the electronic device producer responsibility program as enacted by Section 1 of this Act,
report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, on the substance of the law in relation to the electronic device producer
responsibility program.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that:
(1) electronic device producer responsibility organizations providing
covered entities with program services for covered electronic devices, including the use of
environmentally sound management practices to collect, transport, and recycle, reuse, or
refurbish covered electronic devices, is in the best interests of the public;
(2) electronic device manufacturers that participate in an electronic device
producer responsibility program as enacted by Section 1 of this Act shall be exempt from
State antitrust laws; and
(3) information protected by trademark or patent received by the
Department of the Environment from an electronic device manufacturer or an electronic
device producer responsibility organization as part of an electronic device producer
responsibility program as enacted by Section 1 of this Act constitutes a trade secret and
confidential commercial information.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.